California, session 20252026, SB569.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 891 of the Streets and Highways Code is amended to read:891. (a) All city, county, regional, and other local agencies responsible for the development or operation of bikeways or roadways where bicycle travel is permitted shall utilize the minimum safety design criteria established pursuant to Section 890.6, except as provided in subdivision (b), and shall utilize the uniform specifications and symbols for signs, markers, and traffic control devices established pursuant to Section 890.8.(b) An agency may utilize minimum safety design criteria other than those established by Section 890.6 if all of the following conditions are met:(1) The alternative criteria have been reviewed and approved by a qualified engineer with consideration for the unique characteristics and features of the proposed bikeway and surrounding environs.(2) The alternative criteria, or the description of the project with reference to the alternative criteria, are adopted by resolution at a public meeting, after having provided proper notice of the public meeting and opportunity for public comment.(3) The alternative criteria adhere to guidelines established by a national association of public agency transportation officials.(c) (1) A bikeway constructed constructed, in whole or part, using state general funds moneys from the state General Fund allocated to any city, county, regional, or other local agency shall not be reverted to a nonactive transportation use or modified in a manner that reduces the safety, accessibility, or mobility of nonmotorized users, for a minimum of 20 years from the date of the allocation or its actual useful life, as documented in its project design or local building or permit application materials, whichever is less.(2) Any modification of a bikeway subject to paragraph (1) shall be consistent with an active transportation use and shall be subject, consistent with the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), to both of the following:(A) A duly noticed public meeting to discuss the intent to modify the bikeway.(B) A duly noticed public hearing where the final design of the modification is considered by the city, county, regional, or other local agency.(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “active transportation” means a use that encourages increased use of active modes of transportation, such as biking and walking.SEC. 2.  The Legislature finds and declares that Section 1 of this act amending Section 891 of the Streets and Highways Code addresses a matter of statewide concern rather than a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, Section 1 of this act applies to all cities, including charter cities.